Illinois, session 104th, SB1895.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 15-112 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/15-112)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 15-112)7    Sec. 15-112. Final rate of earnings. "Final rate of 8earnings":9    (a) This subsection (a) applies only to a Tier 1 member. 10    For an employee who is paid on an hourly basis or who 11receives an annual salary in installments during 12 months of 12each academic year, the average annual earnings during the 48 13consecutive calendar month period ending with the last day of 14final termination of employment or the 4 consecutive academic 15years of service in which the employee's earnings were the 16highest, whichever is greater. For any other employee, the 17average annual earnings during the 4 consecutive academic 18years of service in which his or her earnings were the highest. 19For an employee with less than 48 months or 4 consecutive 20academic years of service, the average earnings during his or 21her entire period of service. The earnings of an employee with 22more than 36 months of service under item (a) of Section 2315-113.1 prior to the date of becoming a participant are, for   SB1895- 2 -LRB104 06091 RPS 16124 b1such period, considered equal to the average earnings during 2the last 36 months of such service.3    (b) This subsection (b) applies to a Tier 2 member.4    For an employee who is paid on an hourly basis or who 5receives an annual salary in installments during 12 months of 6each academic year, the average annual earnings obtained by 7dividing by 8 the total earnings of the employee during the 96 8consecutive months in which the total earnings were the 9highest within the last 120 months prior to termination or the 10average annual earnings during the 8 consecutive academic 11years of service within the 10 years of service prior to 12termination in which the employee's earnings were the highest, 13whichever is greater.14    For any other employee, the average annual earnings during 15the 8 consecutive academic years of service within the 10 16years of service prior to termination in which the employee's 17earnings were the highest. For an employee with less than 96 18consecutive months or 8 consecutive academic years of service, 19whichever is necessary, the average earnings during his or her 20entire period of service. 21    The changes made to this subsection (b) by this amendatory 22Act of the 104th General Assembly are corrections and 23clarifications of existing law and are intended to be 24retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective date of Public 25Act 96-1490), notwithstanding the provisions of Section 261-103.1 of this Code.   SB1895- 3 -LRB104 06091 RPS 16124 b1    (c) For an employee on leave of absence with pay, or on 2leave of absence without pay who makes contributions during 3such leave, earnings are assumed to be equal to the basic 4compensation on the date the leave began.5    (d) For an employee on disability leave, earnings are 6assumed to be equal to the basic compensation on the date 7disability occurs or the average earnings during the 24 months 8immediately preceding the month in which disability occurs, 9whichever is greater.10    (e) For a Tier 1 member who retires on or after August 22, 111997 (the effective date of Public Act 90-511) this amendatory 12Act of 1997 with at least 20 years of service as a firefighter 13or police officer under this Article, the final rate of 14earnings shall be the annual rate of earnings received by the 15participant on his or her last day as a firefighter or police 16officer under this Article, if that is greater than the final 17rate of earnings as calculated under the other provisions of 18this Section.19    (f) If a Tier 1 member is an employee for at least 6 months 20during the academic year in which his or her employment is 21terminated, the annual final rate of earnings shall be 25% of 22the sum of (1) the annual basic compensation for that year, and 23(2) the amount earned during the 36 months immediately 24preceding that year, if this is greater than the final rate of 25earnings as calculated under the other provisions of this 26Section.  SB1895- 4 -LRB104 06091 RPS 16124 b1    (g) In the determination of the final rate of earnings for 2an employee, that part of an employee's earnings for any 3academic year beginning after June 30, 1997, which exceeds the 4employee's earnings with that employer for the preceding year 5by more than 20% 20 percent shall be excluded; in the event 6that an employee has more than one employer this limitation 7shall be calculated separately for the earnings with each 8employer. In making such calculation, only the basic 9compensation of employees shall be considered, without regard 10to vacation or overtime or to contracts for summer employment. 11Beginning September 1, 2024, this subsection (g) also applies 12to an employee who has been employed at 1/2 time or less for 3 13or more years. 14    (h) The following are not considered as earnings in 15determining the final rate of earnings: (1) severance or 16separation pay, (2) retirement pay, (3) payment for unused 17sick leave, and (4) payments from an employer for the period 18used in determining the final rate of earnings for any purpose 19other than (i) services rendered, (ii) leave of absence or 20vacation granted during that period, and (iii) vacation of up 21to 56 work days allowed upon termination of employment; except 22that, if the benefit has been collectively bargained between 23the employer and the recognized collective bargaining agent 24pursuant to the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 25payment received during a period of up to 2 academic years for 26unused sick leave may be considered as earnings in accordance   SB1895- 5 -LRB104 06091 RPS 16124 b1with the applicable collective bargaining agreement, subject 2to the 20% increase limitation of this Section. Any unused 3sick leave considered as earnings under this Section shall not 4be taken into account in calculating service credit under 5Section 15-113.4.6    (i) Intermittent periods of service shall be considered as 7consecutive in determining the final rate of earnings.8(Source: P.A. 103-548, eff. 8-11-23; revised 7-18-24.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.